Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-408
Center or group home for the developmentally disabled, defined.

Center or group home for the developmentally disabled means a facility where shelter, food, and care, advice, counseling, diagnosis, treatment, or related services are provided for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to four or more persons residing at such facility who have developmental disabilities.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 8.